District of Columbia statutes.
1-628.04

Transit Commission.

The Mayor is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission to implement the inclusion of the employees of such Commission as participants in the United States Civil Service Retirement System (Chapter 83 of Title 5 of the United States Code).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2804, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-629.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-358.4.